en: white rice
ar: أرز أبيض
bg: бял ориз
ca: arròs blanc
da: hvidt ris, hvide ris
de: weißer Reis
el: λευκό ρύζι
eo: blanka rizo
es: arroz blanco
eu: arroz zuri
fi: valkoinen riisi
fr: riz blanc
ga: arroz branco
hi: वाईट राईस
hr: bijela riža
hu: fehér rizs, fehérrizs
it: riso bianco
ja: 白米
ko: 백미
nl: witte rijst
pl: ryż biały
pt: arroz branco
sv: vitt ris, vita ris
vi: gạo trắng
zh: 白米

en: parboiled Italian black whole grain rice, Italian Black Parboiled Brown Rice
de: Italienischer Schwarzer Parboiled Vollkornreis
es: Arroz Integral Venere Vaporizado
fr: Riz moyen à grains noirs complet étuvé
hr: talijanska crna parboiled smeđa riža
it: Riso Venere Integrale Parboiled
pt: Arroz Integral Venere Parboiled

en: long grain rice
bg: дългозърнест ориз
da: langkornet ris, langkornede ris
de: Langkornreis
es: Arros de grano largo, arroz largo
fi: pitkäjyväinen riisi
fr: riz long grain, riz long blanc, riz long, riz aux grains longs, riz a grain long
hr: riža dugog zrna
hu: hosszú szemű rizs
it: riso a chicco lungo
nl: Langkorrelige rijst
pl: ryż długoziarnisty
sv: långkornigt ris, långkorniga ris

en: organic long grain rice
bg: био дългозърнест ориз
fi: luomu pitkäjyväinen riisi
fr: riz long biologique
hr: organska riža dugog zrna
hu: bio hosszú szemű rizs
it: riso biologico a grani lunghi
sv: ekologisk långkornigt ris

en: superior quality long grain rice
de: Spitzen-Langkornreis
fr: riz long grain de qualité supérieure, riz long de qualité supérieure
hr: riža dugog zrna vrhunske kvalitete
it: riso a grani lunghi di qualità superiore
nl: langkorrelige rijst van hoogwaardige kwaliteit

en: superior quality organic long grain rice
fr: riz long grain biologique de qualite superieure
it: riso a grani lunghi biologico di qualità superiore

en: long grain white rice
bg: бял дългозърнест ориз, дългозърнест бял ориз
de: weißer Langkornreis
fi: pitkäjyväinen valkoinen riisi
fr: riz long grain blanc
hr: bijela riža dugog zrna
hu: hosszú szemű fehérrizs
it: riso bianco a grani lunghi
pl: ryż biały długoziarnisty
sv: långkornigt vitt ris

en: superior quality long grain white rice
de: Premiumqualität weißer Langkornreis
fr: riz blanc long grain de qualite superieure
hr: vrhunska bijela riža dugog zrna
it: riso bianco a grani lunghi di qualità superiore

en: organic long grain white rice
fi: luomu pitkäjyväinen valkoinen riisi
fr: riz long blanc bio
hr: organska bijela riža dugog zrna
it: riso bianco a grani lunghi biologico

en: long grain brown rice, brown long grain rice
bg: кафяв дългозърнест ориз
de: brauner Langkornreis
fi: pitkäjyväinen tumma riisi, pitkäjyväinen täysjyväriisi
fr: riz long complet, riz complet long grain
hr: smeđa riža dugog zrna
hu: hosszú szemű barnarizs
it: riso integrale a grani lunghi
nl: langkorrelige zilvervliesrijst
sv: långkornigt brunt ris

en: parboiled long grain brown rice, parboiled brown long grain rice
de: brauner Parboiled Langkornreis
fi: parboil-käsitelty pitkäjyväinen tumma riisi, parboil-käsitelty pitkäjyväinen täysjyväriisi
fr: riz complet long grain étuvé, riz long complet etuve
hr: prokuhana smeđa riža dugog zrna
hu: forrázott hosszú szemű barnarizs
it: riso integrale parboiled a grani lunghi

fr: riz long parfumé
vi: gạo thóm ðặc biệt
zh: 標香米

en: long grain parboiled rice, parboiled long grain rice
de: Dampfgegarter Spitzen-Langkorn-Reis
es: arroz grano largo vaporizado
fi: pitkäjyväinen parboil riisi, parboil-käsitelty pitkäjyväinen riisi
fr: riz long étuvé, riz long grain étuvé, riz long grain précuit à la vapeur, riz a grain long parboiled, Riz long grain étuvé cuisson rapide, riz long précuite, riz long grain précuit
hr: parboiled riža dugog zrna
hu: forrázott hosszú szemű rizs
it: riso parboiled a grani lunghi
nl: voorgekookte langkorrelrijst
sv: långkornigt parboil ris

en: parboiled organic long grain rice
da: økologisk parboiled langkornede ris
de: Parboiled Bio-Langkornreis
fi: parboil-käsitelty luomu pitkäjyväinen riisi
fr: riz à grain long biologique étuvé
hr: prokuhana organska riža dugog zrna
it: riso parboiled biologico a grani lunghi
nl: Witte langgraanrijst van biologische oorsprong parboiled

en: superior quality long grain parboiled rice
de: Hochwertiger langkörniger Parboiled-Reis
es: arroz grano largo vaporizado de calidad superior
fr: riz long grain étuvé de qualité supérieure, riz long étuvé de qualité supérieure
hr: prokuhana riža dugog zrna vrhunske kvalitete
it: riso parboiled a grani lunghi di qualità superiore

en: superior quality long grain parboiled brown rice
de: brauner Spitzen-Langkornreis parboiled
es: arroz grano largo vaporizado integral de calidad superior
fr: riz long grain complet étuvé de qualité supérieure, riz long complet etuve de qualite superieure
hr: vrhunska kvaliteta parboiled smeđe riže dugog zrna
it: riso integrale parboiled a grani lunghi di qualità superiore

en: medium grain rice
da: mediumkornet ris, mediumkornede ris
sv: mellankornigt ris, mellankorniga ris

en: medium grain white rice
da: mediumkornet hvidt ris, mediumkornede hvide ris
hr: bijela srednjezrnata riža
it: riso bianco a grana media
sv: mellankornigt vitt ris, mellankorniga vita ris

en: round rice
da: kortkornet ris, kortkornede ris
de: Rundkornreis, Milchreis
fi: pyöreäjyväinen riisi
fr: riz rond
hr: okrugla riža
hu: kerek rizs
it: riso tondo
sv: rundkornigt ris

en: organic round rice
fi: luomu pyöreäjyväinen riisi
fr: riz rond biologique
hr: organska okrugla riža
hu: bio kerek rizs
it: riso tondo biologico